Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB957.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7507.1(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7507.1. Invasion of privacy.* * *(b) Grading.--Invasion of privacy is a [misdemeanor] felony of the [second] third degree if there is more than one violation. Otherwise, a violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the [third] first degree.* * *(d.1) Destruction of media.--A person convicted of an offense under this section shall delete or destroy any photograph, videotape, electronic depiction, film, record or any 123456789101112131415161718 other recording associated with the conviction that is in the person's possession in any manner or form. Failure to delete or destroy the media shall constitute a separate offense graded as a felony of the third degree.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0957PN1031 - 2 - 123456